Hawaii statutes.
§88-154 Officers of the board; duties.
The county clerk shall ex officio be the secretary of the board of trustees and
shall keep in a separate book a true and correct account of the proceedings of
the board. The county attorney shall be the legal adviser of the board. The
treasurer of the county shall ex officio be the treasurer of the board. The
auditor of the county shall audit all accounts of the pension system and shall
draw all warrants payable therefrom, which warrants shall be drawn only upon the
order of a majority vote of the three members of the board, which order shall
be certified to by the chairman and one other member of the board. The
treasurer shall collect all moneys belonging to the system, shall have the
custody of all its notes, bonds, and other securities, if any, and shall
collect the principal and interest of the same, and he shall be liable on his
bond as treasurer for the faithful accounting of all moneys and securities
which may come into his hands belonging to the system. The treasurer shall,
upon the expiration of his term of office, account to the board for all moneys,
notes, bonds, and other securities coming into his hands and the proceeds of
the same, and turn over to his successor in the office of treasurer all moneys,
notes, and other securities belonging to the system remaining in his hands. [L
1917, c 220, pt of §1; RL 1925, pt of §2161; RL 1935, pt of §7903; am L 1939, c
86, pt of §1; RL 1945, pt of §6171; RL 1955, §6-133; am L 1963, c 65, §2c; HRS
§88-154]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next